Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3311
Title and registration provisions; department; powers.

The department is authorized to title and register, pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act and the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, automated-driving-system-equipped vehicles and driverless-capable vehicles that do not meet applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards but which have been granted an exemption by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 11.

Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act, see section 60-101.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.